District of Columbia statutes.
38-910

Solicitation of donations from pupils.

No part of any appropriation for the District of Columbia shall be paid to any person employed under or in connection with the public schools of the District of Columbia who shall solicit or receive, or permit to be solicited or received, on any public school premises, any subscription or donation of money or other thing of value from any pupil enrolled in such public schools for presentation of testimonials to school officials or for any purpose except such as may be authorized by the Board of Education at a stated meeting upon the written recommendation of the Superintendent of Schools.

July 1, 1943, 57 Stat. 324, ch. 184, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-2210.
1973 Ed., § 31-1117.